Utah statutes.
31A-19a-308.   Rate service organizations -- Filing requirements.

(1)  A rate service organization shall file with the commissioner any of the following that is used in this state:

(a)  any statistical plan;

(b)  all prospective loss costs;

(c)  provisions for special assessments;

(d)  all supplementary rating information; and

(e)  any change, amendment, or modification of an item described in Subsections (1)(a) through (d).

(2)  The filings required under Subsection (1) shall be subject to Sections 31A-19a-203 and 31A-19a-206 and other provisions of this chapter relating to filings made by insurers.

